Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.045

County may impose fee upon solid waste collection services—Revenue to fund compliance with comprehensive solid waste management plan.

(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose a fee upon the solid waste collection services of a solid waste collection company operating within the unincorporated areas of the county, to fund the administration and planning expenses that may be incurred by the county in complying with the requirements in RCW 70A.205.045. The fee may be in addition to any other solid waste services fees and charges a county may legally impose.

(2) Each county imposing the fee authorized by this section shall notify the Washington utilities and transportation commission and the affected solid waste collection companies of the amount of the fee ninety days prior to its implementation.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1023; 1989 c 431 s 15.]